Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.020

Payment of costs—Federal food services revolving fund—Disbursements.

All reasonably ascertainable costs of performing the duties assumed and performed under RCW 28A.235.010 through 28A.235.030 and * 28A.235.140 by either the superintendent of public instruction or another state or local governmental entity in support of the superintendent of public instruction's duties under RCW 28A.235.010 through 28A.235.030 and * 28A.235.140 shall be paid exclusively with federal funds and, if any, private gifts and grants. The federal food services revolving fund is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall deposit in the fund federal funds received under RCW 28A.235.010, recoveries of such funds, and gifts or grants made to the revolving fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements. The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to expend from the federal food services revolving fund such funds as are necessary to implement RCW 28A.235.010 through 28A.235.030 and * 28A.235.140.

[ 1990 c 33 s 242; 1987 c 193 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.29.020.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.235.140 was repealed by 2023 c 379 s 9.